Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-2208
E-15 Access Standard Act, how cited.

Sections 66-2208 to 66-2218 shall be known and may be cited as the E-15 Access Standard Act.

Laws 2023, LB562, § 1.